California statutes. Public Resources Code
The state lead agency shall include the environmental impact report as a part of the regular project report used in the existing review and budgetary process. It shall be available to the Legislature. It shall also be available for inspection by any member of the general public, who may secure a copy thereof by paying for the actual cost of such a copy. It shall be filed by the state lead agency with the appropriate local planning agency of any city, county, or city and county which will be affected by the project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1200.)
-------------------------------------------

21106.

All state agencies, boards, and commissions shall request in their budgets the funds necessary to protect the environment in relation to problems caused by their activities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1433.)
-------------------------------------------

21108.

(a) If a state agency approves or determines to carry out a project that is subject to this division, the state agency shall file a notice of determination with the Office of Planning and Research. The notice shall identify the person or persons in subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 21065, as reflected in the agency’s record of proceedings, and indicate the determination of the state agency whether the project will, or will not, have a significant effect on the environment and shall indicate whether an environmental impact report has been prepared pursuant to this division.

(b) If a state agency determines that a project is not subject to this division pursuant to subdivision (b) of
 Section 21080 and the state agency approves or determines to carry out the project, the state agency or the person specified in subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 21065 may file a notice of exemption with the Office of Planning and Research. A notice filed pursuant to this subdivision shall identify the person or persons in subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 21065, as reflected in the agency’s record of proceedings. A notice filed pursuant to this subdivision by a person specified in subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 21065 shall have a certificate of determination attached to it issued by the state agency responsible for making the determination that the project is not subject to this division pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 21080. The certificate of determination may be in the form of a certified copy of an existing document or record of the state agency.

(c) A notice filed pursuant to this section shall be available for public inspection on the internet website of the Office of Planning and Research for not less than 12 months.

(d) A notice filed by a state agency pursuant to this section shall be filed electronically with the Office of Planning and Research. The state agency is not required to mail a printed copy of the notice to the Office of Planning and Research.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 28, Sec. 135.   (SB 1380)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Local Agencies [21150. - 21154.]

21150.

State agencies, boards, and commissions, responsible for allocating state or federal funds on a project-by-project basis to local agencies for any project which may have a significant effect on the environment, shall require from the responsible local governmental agency a detailed statement setting forth the matters specified in Section 21100 prior to the allocation of any funds other than funds solely for projects involving only feasibility or planning studies for possible future actions which the agency, board, or commission has not approved, adopted, or funded.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1154.)
-------------------------------------------

21151.

(a) All local agencies shall prepare, or cause to be prepared by contract, and certify the completion of, an environmental impact report on any project that they intend to carry out or approve which may have a significant effect on the environment. When a report is required by Section 65402 of the Government Code, the environmental impact report may be submitted as a part of that report.

(b) For purposes of this section, any significant effect on the environment shall be limited to substantial, or potentially substantial, adverse changes in physical conditions which exist within the area as defined in Section 21060.5.

(c) If a nonelected decisionmaking body of a local lead agency certifies an environmental impact report, approves a negative declaration or mitigated negative declaration, or determines that a project is not subject to this division, that certification, approval, or determination may be appealed to the agency’s elected decisionmaking body, if any.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1121, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

21151.1.

(a) Notwithstanding paragraph (6) of subdivision (b) of Section 21080, or Section 21080.5 or 21084, or any other provision of law, except as provided in this section, a lead agency shall prepare or cause to be prepared by contract, and certify the completion of, an environmental impact report or, if appropriate, a modification, addendum, or supplement to an existing environmental impact report, for a project involving any of the following:

(1) The burning of municipal wastes, hazardous waste, or refuse-derived fuel, including, but not limited to, tires, if the project is either of the following:

(A) The construction of a new facility.

(B) The expansion of an existing facility that burns hazardous waste that would increase its permitted capacity by more than 10 percent.

(2) The initial issuance of a hazardous waste facilities permit to a land disposal facility, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 25199.1 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) The initial issuance of a hazardous waste facilities permit pursuant to Section 25200 of the Health and Safety Code to an offsite large treatment facility, as defined pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 25205.1 of the Health and Safety Code.

(4) A base reuse plan as defined in Section 21083.8.1. The Legislature
 hereby finds that no reimbursement is required pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIIIB of the California Constitution for an environmental impact report for a base reuse plan if an environmental impact report is otherwise required for that base reuse plan pursuant to any other provision of this division.

(b) For purposes of clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), the amount of expansion of an existing facility shall be calculated by comparing the proposed facility capacity with whichever of the following is applicable:

(1) The facility capacity authorized in the facility’s hazardous waste facilities permit pursuant to Section 25200 of the Health and Safety Code or its grant of interim status pursuant to Section 25200.5 of the Health
 and Safety Code, or the facility capacity authorized in a state or local agency permit allowing the construction or operation of a facility for the burning of hazardous waste, granted before January 1, 1990.

(2) The facility capacity authorized in the facility’s original hazardous waste facilities permit, grant of interim status, or a state or local agency permit allowing the construction or operation of a facility for the burning of hazardous waste, granted on or after January 1, 1990.

(c) For purposes of paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (a), the initial issuance of a hazardous waste facilities permit does not include the issuance of a closure or postclosure permit pursuant to Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 25100) of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) Paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) does not apply to a project that does any of the following:

(1) Exclusively burns digester gas produced from manure or any other solid or semisolid animal waste.

(2) Exclusively burns methane gas produced from a disposal site, as defined in Section 40122, that is used only for the disposal of solid waste, as defined in Section 40191.

(3) Exclusively burns forest, agricultural, wood, or other biomass wastes.

(4) Exclusively burns hazardous waste in an incineration unit that is transportable and that is either at a site for not longer than three years or is part of
 a remedial or removal action. For purposes of this paragraph, “transportable” means any equipment that performs a “treatment” as defined in Section 66216 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, and that is transported on a vehicle as defined in Section 66230 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, as those sections read on June 1, 1991.

(5) Exclusively burns refinery waste in a flare on the site of generation.

(6) Exclusively burns in a flare methane gas produced at a municipal sewage treatment plant.

(7) Exclusively burns hazardous waste, or exclusively burns hazardous waste as a supplemental fuel, as part of a research, development, or demonstration project that, consistent with federal regulations
 implementing the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976, as amended (42 U.S.C. Sec. 6901 et seq.), has been determined to be innovative and experimental by the Department of Toxic Substances Control and that is limited in type and quantity of waste to that necessary to determine the efficacy and performance capabilities of the technology or process. However, a facility that operated as a research, development, or demonstration project and for which an application is thereafter submitted for a
 hazardous waste facility permit for operation other than as a research, development, or demonstration project shall be considered a new facility for the burning of hazardous waste and shall be subject to subdivision (a) of Section 21151.1.

(8) Exclusively burns soils contaminated only with petroleum fuels or the vapors from these soils.

(9) Exclusively treats less than 3,000 pounds of hazardous waste per day in a thermal processing unit operated in the absence of open flame, and submits a worst-case health risk assessment of the technology to the Department of Toxic Substances Control for review and distribution to the interested public. This assessment shall be prepared in accordance with guidelines set forth in the Air Toxics Assessment Manual of the California
 Air Pollution Control Officers Association.

(10) Exclusively burns less than 1,200 pounds per day of medical waste, as defined in Section 117690 of the Health and Safety Code, on hospital sites.

(11) Exclusively burns chemicals and fuels as part of firefighter training.

(12) Exclusively conducts open burns of explosives subject to the requirements of the air pollution control district or air quality management district and in compliance with OSHA and Cal-OSHA regulations.

(13) Exclusively conducts onsite burning of less than 3,000 pounds per day of fumes directly from a manufacturing or commercial process.

(14) Exclusively conducts onsite burning of hazardous waste in an industrial furnace that recovers hydrogen chloride from the flue gas if the hydrogen chloride is subsequently sold, distributed in commerce, or used in a manufacturing process at the site where the hydrogen chloride is recovered, and the burning is in compliance with the requirements of the air pollution control district or air quality management district and the Department of Toxic Substances Control.

(e) Paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) does not apply to a project for which the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission has assumed jurisdiction under Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 25500) of Division 15.

(f) Paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (a) do not apply if the facility
 only manages hazardous waste that is identified or listed pursuant to Section 25140 or 25141 of the Health and Safety Code on or after January 1, 1992, but not before that date, or only conducts activities that are regulated pursuant to Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 25100) of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code on or after January 1, 1992, but not before that date.

(g) This section does not exempt a project from any other requirement of this division.

(h) For purposes of this section, offsite facility means a facility that serves more than one generator of hazardous waste.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 548, Sec. 10.   (AB 2669)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

21151.2.

To promote the safety of pupils and comprehensive community planning the governing board of each school district before acquiring title to property for a new school site or for an addition to a present school site, shall give the planning commission having jurisdiction notice in writing of the proposed acquisition. The planning commission shall investigate the proposed site and within 30 days after receipt of the notice shall submit to the governing board a written report of the investigation and its recommendations concerning acquisition of the site.

The governing board shall not acquire title to the property until the report of the planning commission has been received. If the report does not favor the acquisition of the property for a school site, or for an addition to a present school site, the governing board of the school district shall not acquire title to the property until 30 days after the commission’s report is received.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 533.)
-------------------------------------------

21151.4.

(a) An environmental impact report shall not be certified or a negative declaration shall not be approved for any project involving the construction or alteration of a facility within one-fourth of a mile of a school that might reasonably be anticipated to emit hazardous air emissions, or that would handle an extremely hazardous substance or a mixture containing extremely hazardous substances in a quantity equal to or greater than the state threshold quantity specified pursuant to subdivision (m) of Section 25532 of the Health and Safety Code, that may pose a health or safety hazard to persons who would attend or would be employed at the school, unless both of the following occur:

(1) The lead agency preparing the environmental impact report or negative declaration has consulted with the school district having jurisdiction regarding the potential impact of the project on the school.

(2) The school district has been given written notification of the project not less than 30 days prior to the proposed certification of the environmental impact report or approval of the negative declaration.

(b) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Extremely hazardous substance” means an extremely hazardous substance as defined pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (i) of Section 25532 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) “Hazardous air emissions” means emissions into the ambient air of air contaminants that have been identified as a toxic air contaminant by the State Air Resources Board or by the air pollution control officer for the jurisdiction in which the project is located. As determined by the air pollution control officer, hazardous air emissions also means emissions into the ambient air of a substance identified in subdivisions (a) to (f), inclusive, of Section 44321 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 115, Sec. 69.   (AB 148)   Effective July 22, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

21151.5.

(a) (1) For projects described in subdivision (c) of Section 21065, each local agency shall establish, by ordinance or resolution, time limits that do not exceed the following:

(A) One year for completing and certifying environmental impact reports.

(B) One hundred eighty days for completing and adopting negative declarations.

(2) The time limits specified in paragraph (1) shall apply only to those circumstances in which the local agency is the lead agency for a project. These ordinances or resolutions may establish different time limits for different types or classes of projects and different types of environmental impact reports, but all limits shall be measured from the date on which an application requesting approval of the project is received and accepted as complete by the local agency.

(3) No application for a project may be deemed incomplete for lack of a waiver of time periods prescribed by local ordinance or resolution.

(4) The ordinances or resolutions required by this section may provide for a reasonable extension of the time period in the event that compelling circumstances justify additional time and the project applicant consents thereto.

(b) If a draft environmental impact report, environmental impact report, or focused environmental impact report is prepared under a contract to a local agency, the contract shall be executed within 45 days from the date on which the local agency sends a notice of preparation pursuant to Section 21080.4. The local agency may take longer to execute the contract if the project applicant and the local agency mutually agree to an extension of the time limit provided by this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 808, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

21151.7.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a lead agency shall prepare or cause to be prepared by contract, and certify the completion of, an environmental impact report for any open-pit mining operation that is subject to the permit requirements or reclamation plan requirements of the Surface Mining and Reclamation Act of 1975 (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 2710) of Division 2) and utilizes a cyanide heap-leaching process for the purpose of producing gold or other metallic minerals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1154, Sec. 5.5.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Operative April 7, 2003, pursuant to Stats. 2003, Ch. 3, Secs. 2 and 3.   Note: Stats. 2003, Ch. 3 (effective April 7) repealed the condition in Stats. 2002, Ch. 1154, Sec. 8, which had prevented Ch. 1154 from becoming operative.)
-------------------------------------------

21151.8.

(a) An environmental impact report shall not be certified or a negative declaration shall not be approved for a project involving the purchase of a schoolsite or the construction of a new elementary or secondary school by a school district unless all of the following occur:

(1) The environmental impact report or negative declaration includes information that is needed to determine if the property proposed to be purchased, or to be constructed upon, is any of the following:

(A) The site of a current or former hazardous waste disposal site or solid waste disposal site and, if so, whether the wastes have been removed.

(B) A hazardous
 substance release site identified by the Department of Toxic Substances Control in a current list adopted pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 78760) of Chapter 4 of Part 2 of Division 45 of the Health and Safety Code for removal or remedial action pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section 78000) of Division 45 of the Health and Safety Code.

(C) A site that contains one or more pipelines, situated underground or aboveground, that carries hazardous substances, extremely hazardous substances, or hazardous wastes, unless the pipeline is a natural gas line that is used only to supply natural gas to that school or neighborhood, or other nearby schools.

(D) A site that is within 500 feet of the edge of the closest traffic lane of a freeway or other busy traffic corridor.

(2) (A) The school
 district, as the lead agency, in preparing the environmental impact report or negative declaration has notified in writing and consulted with the administering agency in which the proposed schoolsite is located, pursuant to Section 2735.3 of Title 19 of the California Code of Regulations, and with any air pollution control district or air quality management district having jurisdiction in the area, to identify both permitted and nonpermitted facilities within that district’s authority, including, but not limited to, freeways and busy traffic corridors, large agricultural operations, and railyards, within one-fourth of a mile of the proposed schoolsite, that might reasonably be anticipated to emit hazardous emissions or handle hazardous or extremely hazardous substances or waste. The notification by the school district, as the lead agency, shall include a list of the locations for which information is sought.

(B) Each administering agency, air
 pollution control district, or air quality management district receiving written notification from a lead agency to identify facilities pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall provide the requested information and provide a written response to the lead agency within 30 days of receiving the notification. The environmental impact report or negative declaration shall be conclusively presumed to comply with subparagraph (A) as to the area of responsibility of an agency that does not respond within 30 days.

(C) If the school district, as a lead agency, has carried out the consultation required by subparagraph (A), the environmental impact report or the negative declaration shall be conclusively presumed to comply with subparagraph (A), notwithstanding any failure of the consultation to identify an existing facility or other pollution source specified in subparagraph (A).

(3) The governing
 board of the school district makes one of the following written findings:

(A) Consultation identified no facilities of this type or other significant pollution sources specified in paragraph (2).

(B) The facilities or other pollution sources specified in paragraph (2) exist, but one of the following conditions applies:

(i) The health risks from the facilities or other pollution sources do not and will not constitute an actual or potential endangerment of public health to persons who would attend or be employed at the proposed school.

(ii) Corrective measures required under an existing order by another agency having jurisdiction over the facilities or other pollution sources will, before the school is occupied, result in the mitigation of all chronic or
 accidental hazardous air emissions to levels that do not constitute an actual or potential endangerment of public health to persons who would attend or be employed at the proposed school. If the governing board makes a finding pursuant to this clause, it shall also make a subsequent finding, prior to occupancy of the school, that the emissions have been so mitigated.

(iii) For a schoolsite with a boundary that is within 500 feet of the edge of the closest traffic lane of a freeway or other busy traffic corridor, the governing board of the school district determines, through analysis pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 44360 of the Health and Safety Code, based on appropriate air dispersion modeling, and after considering any potential mitigation measures, that the air quality at the proposed site is such that neither short-term nor long-term exposure poses significant health risks to pupils.

(C) The facilities or other pollution sources specified in paragraph (2) exist, but conditions in clause (i), (ii), or (iii) of subparagraph (B) cannot be met, and the school district is unable to locate an alternative site that is suitable due to a severe shortage of sites that meet the requirements in subdivision (a) of Section 17213 of the Education Code. If the governing board makes this finding, the governing board shall adopt a statement of overriding considerations pursuant to Section 15093 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.

(b) As used in this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Hazardous substance” means any substance defined in subdivision (a) of Section 78075 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) “Extremely
 hazardous substances” means an extremely hazardous substance as defined pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (i) of Section 25532 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) “Hazardous waste” means any waste defined in Section 25117 of the Health and Safety Code.

(4) “Hazardous waste disposal site” means any site defined in Section 25114 of the Health and Safety Code.

(5) “Hazardous air emissions” means emissions into the ambient air of air contaminants that have been identified as a toxic air contaminant by the State Air Resources Board or by the air pollution control officer for the jurisdiction in which the project is located. As determined by the air pollution control officer, hazardous air emissions also means emissions into the ambient air from any substances identified in subdivisions (a) to (f), inclusive, of
 Section 44321 of the Health and Safety Code.

(6) “Administering agency” means an agency authorized pursuant to Section 25502 of the Health and Safety Code to implement and enforce Chapter 6.95 (commencing with Section 25500) of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code.

(7) “Handle” means handle as defined in Article 1 (commencing with Section 25500) of Chapter 6.95 of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code.

(8) “Facilities” means any source with a potential to use, generate, emit, or discharge hazardous air pollutants, including, but not limited to, pollutants that meet the definition of a hazardous substance, and whose process or operation is identified as an emission source pursuant to the most recent list of source categories published by the California Air Resources Board.

(9) “Freeway or other busy traffic corridors” means those roadways that, on an average day, have traffic in excess of 50,000 vehicles in a rural area, as defined in Section 50101 of the Health and Safety Code, and 100,000 vehicles in an urban area, as defined in Section 50104.7 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 258, Sec. 118.   (AB 2327)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2024, pursuant to Sec. 130 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 258.)
-------------------------------------------

21151.9.

Whenever a city or county determines that a project, as defined in Section 10912 of the Water Code, is subject to this division, it shall comply with Part 2.10 (commencing with Section 10910) of Division 6 of the Water Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 643, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

21152.

(a) If a local agency approves or determines to carry out a project that is subject to this division, the local agency shall file a notice of determination within five working days after the approval or determination becomes final, with the county clerk of each county in which the project will be located and with the State Clearinghouse in the Office of Planning and Research. The notice shall identify the person or persons in subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 21065, as reflected in the agency’s record of proceedings, and indicate the determination of the local agency whether the project will, or will not, have a significant effect on the environment and shall indicate whether an environmental impact report has been prepared pursuant to this
 division. The notice shall also include certification that the final environmental impact report, if one was prepared, together with comments and responses, is available to the general public.

(b) If a local agency determines that a project is not subject to this division pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 21080, and the local agency approves or determines to carry out the project, the local agency or the person specified in subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 21065 may file a notice of exemption with the county clerk of each county in which the project will be located and with the State Clearinghouse in the Office of Planning and Research. A notice filed pursuant to this subdivision shall identify the person or persons in subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 21065, as reflected in the agency’s record of proceedings. A notice filed pursuant to
 this subdivision by a person specified in subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 21065 shall have a certificate of determination attached to it issued by the local agency responsible for making the determination that the project is not subject to this division pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 21080. The certificate of determination may be in the form of a certified copy of an existing document or record of the local agency.

(c) (1) A notice filed pursuant to this section, including any subsequent or amended notice, shall be available for public inspection, and shall be posted within 24 hours of receipt in the office and on the internet website of the county
 clerk. A notice shall remain posted for a period of 30 days. Thereafter, the clerk shall return the notice to the local agency with a notation of the period it was posted. The local agency shall retain the notice for not less than 12 months.

(2) A notice filed pursuant to this section, including any subsequent or amended notice, shall be posted by the Office of Planning and Research within 24 hours of receipt on the State Clearinghouse internet website. A notice shall remain posted for a period of 30 days. Provided that notices have been filed in accordance with subdivision (a) or (b), as applicable, nothing in this paragraph shall affect the time limitations contained in Section 21167.

(d) A notice filed by a local agency pursuant to this section shall be filed
 electronically with the State Clearinghouse in the Office of Planning and Research and with the county clerk if that option is offered by the county clerk.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 860, Sec. 2.   (SB 69)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

21152.1.

(a) When a local agency determines that a project is not subject to this division pursuant to Section 21159.22, 21159.23, or 21159.24, and it approves or determines to carry out that project, the local agency or the person specified in subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 21065, shall file a notice of exemption with the Office of Planning and Research.

(b) All notices filed pursuant to this section shall be available for public inspection, and a list of these notices shall be posted on a weekly basis in the Office of Planning and Research. Each list shall remain posted for a period of 30 days.

(c) Failure to file the notice required by this section does not
 affect the validity of a project.

(d) Nothing in this section affects the time limitations contained in Section 21167.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 466, Sec. 8.   (AB 1824)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

21153.

(a) Prior to completing an environmental impact report, every local lead agency shall consult with, and obtain comments from, each responsible agency, trustee agency, any public agency that has jurisdiction by law with respect to the project, and any city or county that borders on a city or county within which the project is located unless otherwise designated annually by agreement between the local lead agency and the city or county, and may consult with any person who has special expertise with respect to any environmental impact involved. In the case of a project described in subdivision (c) of Section 21065, the local lead agency shall, upon the request of the project applicant, provide for early consultation to identify the range of actions, alternatives, mitigation measures, and significant effects to be analyzed in depth in the environmental impact report. The local lead agency may consult with persons identified by the project applicant who the applicant believes will be concerned with the environmental effects of the project and may consult with members of the public who have made written request to be consulted on the project. A request by the project applicant for early consultation shall be made not later than 30 days after the date that the determination required by Section 21080.1 was made with respect to the project. The local lead agency may charge and collect a fee from the project applicant in an amount that does not exceed the actual costs of the consultations.

(b) In the case of a project described in subdivision (a) of Section 21065, the lead agency may provide for early consultation to identify the range of actions, alternatives, mitigation measures, and significant effects to be analyzed in depth in the environmental impact report. At the request of the lead agency, the Office of Planning and Research shall ensure that each responsible agency, and any public agency that has jurisdiction by law with respect to the project, is notified regarding any early consultation.

(c) A responsible agency or other public agency shall only make substantive comments regarding those activities involved in a project that are within an area of expertise of the agency or that are required to be carried out or approved by the agency. Those comments shall be supported by specific documentation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 744, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

21154.

Whenever any state agency, board, or commission issues an order which requires a local agency to carry out a project which may have a significant effect on the environment, any environmental impact report which the local agency may prepare shall be limited to consideration of those factors and alternatives which will not conflict with such order.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1154.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4.2. Implementation of the Sustainable Communities Strategy [21155. - 21155.4.]

21155.

(a) This chapter applies only to a transit priority project that is consistent with the general use designation, density, building intensity, and applicable policies specified for the project area in either a sustainable communities strategy or an alternative planning strategy, for which the State Air Resources Board, pursuant to subparagraph (H) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 65080 of the Government Code, has accepted a metropolitan planning organization’s determination that the sustainable communities strategy or the alternative planning strategy would, if implemented, achieve the greenhouse gas emission reduction targets.

(b) For purposes of this chapter, a transit priority project shall (1) contain at least 50 percent residential use, based on total building square footage and, if the project contains between 26 percent and 50 percent nonresidential uses, a floor area ratio of not less than 0.75; (2) provide a minimum net density of at least 20 dwelling units per acre; and (3) be within one-half mile of a major transit stop or high-quality transit corridor included in a regional transportation plan. A major transit stop is as defined in Section 21064.3, except that, for purposes of this section, it also includes major transit stops that are included in the applicable regional transportation plan. For purposes of this section, a high-quality transit corridor means a corridor with fixed route bus service with service intervals no longer than 15 minutes during peak commute hours. A project shall be considered to be within one-half mile of a major transit stop or high-quality transit corridor if all parcels within the project have no more than 25 percent of their area farther than one-half mile from the stop or corridor and if not more than 10 percent of the residential units or 100 units, whichever is less, in the project are farther than one-half mile from the stop or corridor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 728, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

21155.1.

If the legislative body finds, after conducting a public hearing, that a transit priority project meets all of the requirements of subdivisions (a) and (b) and one of the requirements of subdivision (c), the transit priority project is declared to be a sustainable communities project and shall be exempt from this division.

(a) The transit priority project complies with all of the following environmental criteria:

(1) The transit priority project and other projects approved prior to the approval of the transit priority project but not yet built can be adequately served by existing utilities, and the transit priority project applicant has
 paid, or has committed to pay, all applicable in-lieu or development fees.

(2) (A) The site of the transit priority project does not contain wetlands or riparian areas and does not have significant value as a wildlife habitat, and the transit priority project does not harm any species protected by the federal Endangered Species Act of 1973 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.), the Native Plant Protection Act (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 1900) of Division 2 of the Fish and Game Code), or the California Endangered Species Act (Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code), and the project does not cause the destruction or removal of any species protected by a local ordinance in effect at the time the application for the project was deemed complete.

(B) For the purposes of this paragraph, “wetlands” has the same meaning as
 in the United States Fish and Wildlife Service Manual, Part 660 FW 2 (June 21, 1993).

(C) For the purposes of this paragraph:

(i) “Riparian areas” means those areas transitional between terrestrial and aquatic ecosystems and that are distinguished by gradients in biophysical conditions, ecological processes, and biota. A riparian area is an area through which surface and subsurface hydrology connect waterbodies with their adjacent uplands. A riparian area includes those portions of terrestrial ecosystems that significantly influence exchanges of energy and matter with aquatic ecosystems. A riparian area is adjacent to perennial, intermittent, and ephemeral streams, lakes, and estuarine-marine shorelines.

(ii) “Wildlife habitat” means the ecological communities upon which wild animals, birds, plants, fish, amphibians,
 and invertebrates depend for their conservation and protection.

(iii) Habitat of “significant value” includes wildlife habitat of national, statewide, regional, or local importance; habitat for species protected by the federal Endangered Species Act of 1973 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531, et seq.), the California Endangered Species Act (Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code), or the Native Plant Protection Act (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 1900) of Division 2 of the Fish and Game Code); habitat identified as candidate, fully protected, sensitive, or species of special status by local, state, or federal agencies; or habitat essential to the movement of resident or migratory wildlife.

(3) The site of the transit priority project is not included on any list of facilities and sites compiled pursuant to Section 65962.5 of the Government
 Code.

(4) The site of the transit priority project is subject to a preliminary endangerment assessment prepared by an environmental assessor to determine the existence of any release of a hazardous substance on the site and to determine the potential for exposure of future occupants to significant health hazards from any nearby property or activity.

(A) If a release of a hazardous substance is found to exist on the site, the release shall be removed or any significant effects of the release shall be mitigated to a level of insignificance in compliance with state and federal requirements.

(B) If a potential for exposure to significant hazards from surrounding properties or activities is found to exist, the effects of the potential exposure shall be mitigated to a level of insignificance in compliance with state and
 federal requirements.
